Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2848
Written protocol, defined.

Written protocol means a written template, agreed to by pharmacists and practitioners with independent prescribing authority, working in concert, which directs how the pharmacists will implement and monitor a therapeutic plan.

Laws 2017, LB166, § 13.